Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.018, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Authority of local government. (a) A local government unit that receives state grants-in-aid for any trail, with the concurrence of the commissioner, and the landowner or land lessee, may: (1) designate the trail for use by snowmobiles or for nonmotorized use from December 1 to April 1 of any year; and (2) issue any permit required under subdivisions 3 to 5. (b) A local government unit that receives state grants-in-aid under section 84.794, subdivision 2, 84.803, subdivision 2, or 84.927, subdivision 2, for any trail, with the concurrence of the commissioner, and landowner or land lessee, may: (1) designate the trail specifically for use at various times of the year by all-terrain or off-road vehicles or off-highway motorcyclesdeleted text begin , fordeleted text end new text begin . The local government may also designate the trail fornew text end nonmotorized use deleted text begin such as ski touring, snowshoeing, and hiking, and for multiple usedeleted text end new text begin by following the same process used to designate the trail for motorized use. The designation process may coincide with any new grant-in-aid trail designation processnew text end ; and (2) issue any permit required under subdivisions 3 to 5. (c) A local unit of government that receives state grants-in-aid for any trail, with the concurrence of the commissioner and landowner or land lessee, may designate certain trails for joint use by snowmobiles, off-highway motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, and off-road vehicles. (d) A local unit of government may not prohibit or otherwise restrict operation of an electric-assisted bicycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 27, on any trail under this section designated for bicycle use or nonmotorized use that includes bicycles, unless the local unit of government determines that operation of the electric-assisted bicycle is not consistent with (1) the safety or general welfare of trail users; or (2) the terms of any property conveyance. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.018, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Nonmotorized use trails. No motorized vehicle shall be operated on a trail designated for nonmotorized usenew text begin onlynew text end . This subdivision does not apply to (1) motorized wheelchairs or other motorized devices operated by an individual who is physically disabled; or (2) electric-assisted bicycles, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 27. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.018, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Nonmotorized use designation; grants-in-aid trails. new text end new text begin A trail that has been funded at any time with state grants-in-aid under section 84.794, subdivision 2; 84.803, subdivision 2; or 84.927, subdivision 2, is closed to nonmotorized use unless the trail has been designated for nonmotorized use following the process used to designate trails for motorized use. new text end